Utah statutes.
63G-3-304.   Emergency rulemaking procedure.

(1)  All agencies shall comply with the rulemaking procedures of Section 63G-3-301 unless an agency finds that these procedures would:

(a)  cause an imminent peril to the public health, safety, or welfare;

(b)  cause an imminent budget reduction because of budget restraints or federal requirements; or

(c)  place the agency in violation of federal or state law.

(2) (a)  When finding that its rule is excepted from regular rulemaking procedures by this section, the agency shall file with the division:

(i) the text of the rule; and

(ii)  a rule analysis that includes the specific reasons and justifications for its findings.

(b)  The division shall publish the rule in the bulletin as provided in Subsection 63G-3-301(4).

(c)  The agency shall notify interested persons as provided in Subsection 63G-3-301(10).

(d)  The rule becomes effective for a period not exceeding 120 days on the date of filing or any later date designated in the rule.

(3)  If the agency intends the rule to be effective beyond 120 days, the agency shall also comply with the procedures of Section 63G-3-301.



Amended by Chapter 300, 2008 General Session 

Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

